Illinois, session 104th, HB5740.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Certified Community Behavioral 5Health Clinics Act is amended by Section 3-10 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 34/3-10 new)7    Sec. 3-10. Expansion of the Illinois Certified Community 8Behavioral Health Clinic Medicaid Demonstration program.9    (a) The General Assembly finds that:10        (1) Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics 11    improve access to comprehensive, community-based 12    behavioral health services, including crisis services, 13    care coordination, and integrated treatment for mental 14    health and substance use disorders;15        (2) the federal Substance Abuse and Mental Health 16    Services Administration has awarded time-limited grants to 17    behavioral health providers certified as CCBHCs to 18    implement and demonstrate the CCBHC model;19        (3) the long-term sustainability of federally 20    certified CCBHCs requires stable Medicaid reimbursement 21    through participation in the Illinois Certified Community 22    Behavioral Health Clinic Medicaid Demonstration program; 23    and  HB5740- 2 -LRB104 21070 BAB 35142 b1        (4) it is in the public interest to preserve and 2    sustain existing federally certified CCBHC capacity rather 3    than allow services to terminate at the conclusion of 4    federal grant funding. 5    The purpose of this Section is to establish a limited and 6targeted expansion mechanism to admit certain federally 7certified CCBHCs into the Illinois Certified Community 8Behavioral Health Clinic Medicaid Demonstration program. 9    (b) As used in this Section:10    "CCBHC" means Certified Community Behavioral Health 11Clinic.12    "Department" means the Department of Healthcare and Family 13Services. 14    "SAMHSA" means the federal Substance Abuse and Mental 15Health Services Administration. 16    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 17behavioral health services provider shall be eligible and 18admitted to the Illinois Certified Community Behavioral Health 19Clinic Medicaid Demonstration program if the provider meets 20all of the following criteria:21        (1) the provider is currently certified as a Certified 22    Community Behavioral Health Clinic by SAMHSA;23        (2) the provider was in existence on January 1, 2026 24    and is actively receiving a federal CCBHC grant from 25    SAMHSA;26        (3) the provider is located in Illinois and provides   HB5740- 3 -LRB104 21070 BAB 35142 b1    services to Illinois Medicaid beneficiaries; and2        (4) the provider demonstrates compliance with all 3    federal CCBHC certification requirements and applicable 4    State Medicaid participation requirements.5    (d) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 6approve participation in the Illinois Certified Community 7Behavioral Health Clinic Medicaid Demonstration program for 8any provider meeting the eligibility criteria in subsection 9(c). Admission under this Section shall not be subject to 10competitive selection, numerical caps, or discretionary 11limitation.12    (e) The Department shall ensure that admission to the 13Illinois Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Medicaid 14Demonstration program occurs no later than the end of the 15provider's SAMHSA CCBHC grant period so that there is no lapse 16in reimbursement or disruption of services.17    (f) Providers admitted to the Illinois Certified Community 18Behavioral Health Clinic Medicaid Demonstration program under 19this Section shall be reimbursed using the Illinois CCBHC 20prospective payment system methodology, consistent with 21federal demonstration requirements and State plan or waiver 22authority.23    (g) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 24authorize general expansion of the Illinois Certified 25Community Behavioral Health Clinic Medicaid Demonstration 26program beyond providers meeting the criteria in subsection   HB5740- 4 -LRB104 21070 BAB 35142 b1(c).2    (h) The Department may adopt rules necessary to implement 3this Section, so long as the rules do not impose additional 4eligibility requirements beyond those expressly stated in this 5Section.  6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.